Utah statutes.
76-9-1005.   Illegal alien -- Notification of federal government -- Transportation to federal facility.

A state or local law enforcement agency may securely transport an alien who is in the agency's custody and whom the agency has verified is unlawfully present in the United States to a federal detention facility in this state or, with the concurrence of the receiving federal agency, to a federal facility or other point of transfer to federal custody that is outside this state.

